Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-808
Ballots for early
voting; delivery;
special ballot; publication of application form.

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in section 32-939.02, ballots for early voting to be mailed pursuant to section 32-941 shall
be ready for delivery to registered voters at least thirty-five days prior
to each statewide primary or general election and at least fifteen days prior
to all other elections.

(2) The
election commissioner or county clerk shall not mail
or issue any ballot for early voting if the election to which
such ballot pertains has already been held.

(3) The election commissioner
or county clerk shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county an application form to be used by registered voters in making an application
for a ballot for early voting after the ballots become available. The publication
of the application shall not be required if the election is held by mail pursuant
to sections 32-952 to 32-959.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 229;

Laws 1996, LB 964, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 74;

Laws 1999, LB 571, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB646, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB951, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB271, § 1.

Ballots for early voting for school bond elections, see section 10-703.01.